Tennessee, session 114, HB1802.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-11-614, is amended by deleting
subsection (c) and substituting instead the following:
(c)
(1) Except as provided in subdivision (c)(2), a person is justified in using
deadly force against another:
(A) If the person would be justified in using force against another
under subsection (a) or (b);
(B) When and to the degree the person reasonably believes
deadly force is immediately necessary to prevent or terminate the other's
actual or attempted trespass; arson; damage to property, including
damage to livestock; burglary; theft; robbery; or aggravated cruelty to
animals; and
(C) The person reasonably believes:
(i) The property cannot be protected or the other's actions
terminated by any other means; or
(ii) The use of force other than deadly force to protect or
terminate the other's actions would expose the person or a third
person to a risk of death or serious bodily injury.
(2) A person is not justified in using deadly force against another
individual under this section if the individual is facing away from the person.
HB1802
011690
- 1 -

SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 011690